dev/apertium-urd.urd.dix
    <pardef n="چھ/انٹنا__vblex_caus2">
      <e><p>          <l>نٹوانا</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹوانے</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹواؤں</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹوائیں</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹواؤں</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹوائیں</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹواؤ</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹواؤ</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹواؤ</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹواؤ</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹوا</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹواؤ</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹوا</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹواؤ</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹواؤ</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹوائیے</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹوائیں</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹوائیے</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹوائیں</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹواؤ</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹوائیے</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹوائیں</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹوائیے</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹوائیں</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹوائے</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹوائیں</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹوائے</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹوائیں</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹوائے</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹوائیں</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹوائے</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹوائیں</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹواتا</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹواتے</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹواتی</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹواتیں</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹواتے</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹواتے</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹواتی</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹواتیں</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹواتیں</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹواتا</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹواتے</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹواتی</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹواتیں</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹواتے</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹواتے</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹواتی</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹواتیں</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹواتیں</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹواتا</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹواتے</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹواتی</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹواتیں</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹواتا</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹواتے</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نٹواتی</l><r>انٹنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    <e lm="چھانٹنا"><i>چھ</i><par n="چھ/انٹنا__vblex_caus2"/></e>
